test/src/morphology/N-schetxwed_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - sčətxʷəd: # Noun 102 'eng bear' - full paradigm
     sčətxʷəd+N+Sg: sčətxʷəd
     sčətxʷəd+N+Sg+PxSg1: dsčətxʷəd
     sčətxʷəd+N+Sg+PxSg2: adsčətxʷəd
     sčətxʷəd+N+Sg+PxSg3: sčətxʷəds
     sčətxʷəd+N+Sg+PxPl1: sčətxʷədčəɬ
     sčətxʷəd+N+Sg+PxPl2: sčətxʷədləp
     sčətxʷəd+N+Pl: sčətčətxʷəd
     sčətxʷəd+N+Pl+PxSg1: dsčətčətxʷəd
     sčətxʷəd+N+Pl+PxSg2: adsčətčətxʷəd
     sčətxʷəd+N+Pl+PxSg3: sčətčətxʷəds
     sčətxʷəd+N+Pl+PxPl1: sčətčətxʷədčəɬ
     sčətxʷəd+N+Pl+PxPl2: sčətčətxʷədləp
# bear cubs seem to be regular derivation
     sčətxʷəd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg: sčičtxʷəd
     sčətxʷəd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+PxSg1: dsčičtxʷəd
     sčətxʷəd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+PxSg2: adsčičtxʷəd
     sčətxʷəd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+PxSg3: sčičtxʷəds
     sčətxʷəd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+PxPl1: sčičtxʷədčəɬ
     sčətxʷəd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+PxPl2: sčičtxʷədləp
     sčətxʷəd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl: sčičičtxʷəd
     sčətxʷəd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+PxSg1: dsčičičtxʷəd
     sčətxʷəd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+PxSg2: adsčičičtxʷəd
     sčətxʷəd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+PxSg3: sčičičtxʷəds
     sčətxʷəd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+PxPl1: sčičičtxʷədčəɬ
     sčətxʷəd+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+PxPl2: sčičičtxʷədləp
